Illinois, session 104th, HB2105.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Tax Preparer Oversight Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 35/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the State 8Tax Preparer Oversight Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-641, eff. 1-1-17.)